Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201177-27,139.02
Aid to municipalities;
terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-27,139.01
to 77-27,139.04:

(1) Average per capita property tax levy means the total property
taxes levied by all incorporated municipalities in each population group for
the immediately preceding fiscal year, except for the amount of property tax
levies committed to provide for principal and interest payments on the indebtedness
of all incorporated municipalities, divided by the current population of all
incorporated municipalities as certified by the Department
of Revenue pursuant to section 77-3,119. The average per
capita property tax levy shall be calculated separately for each population
group;

(2) Average property tax levy means the total property taxes
levied by all incorporated municipalities for the prior year, except for the
amount of property tax levies committed to provide for principal and interest
payments on the indebtedness of all incorporated municipalities, divided by
the total amount of valuation subject to property tax in all incorporated
municipalities for the immediately preceding fiscal year;

(3) Population means the population of a municipality as determined
in section 77-3,119; and

(4) Population group means one of three groupings of municipalities
for which the aid established by sections 77-27,139.01 to 77-27,139.04 is
calculated based on the average per capita property tax levy calculated separately
for each group. The three population groups shall be (a) municipalities with
a population of five thousand inhabitants or more, (b) municipalities with
a population between eight hundred and five thousand inhabitants, and (c)
municipalities with a population of eight hundred inhabitants or less.

Laws 1996, LB 1177, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 269, § 54;

Laws 2011, LB383, § 3.
July 1, 2011